incubator/apertium-asm-ben/apertium-asm-ben.ben.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>  <alphabet>ঁংঃঅআইঈউঊঋঌএঐওঔকখগঘঙচছজঝঞটঠডঢণতথদধনপফবভমযরলশষসহ়ঽািীুূৃৄেৈোৌ্ৎৗড়ঢ়য়ৠৡৢৣ০১২৩৪৫৬৭৮৯ৰৱ৲৳৴৵৶৷৸৹৺</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
			<sdef n="n"/> 			<!-- noun -->
			<sdef n="sg"/>			<!-- singular -->
			<sdef n="pl"/>			<!-- plural -->
			<sdef n="m"/>			<!-- male -->
			<sdef n="f"/>			<!-- female -->
			<sdef n="subj"/>		<!-- subject -->
			<sdef n="obj"/>			<!-- object -->
			<sdef n="where"/>		<!-- where -->
			<sdef n="pos"/>			<!-- possessive -->
			<sdef n="gen"/>			<!-- genitivo -->
			<sdef n="dat"/>			<!-- dativo -->
			<sdef n="np"/> 			<!-- proper nouns -->
			<sdef n="enc"/> 		<!-- enclitics -->
    			<sdef n="vblex"/> 		<!-- verb --> 
    			<sdef n="vbser"/> 		<!-- verb --> 
			<sdef n="pres"/>		<!-- present -->
			<sdef n="prescont"/>		<!-- present continuous -->
			<sdef n="past"/>		<!-- past -->
			<sdef n="pastcont"/>		<!-- past continuous -->
			<sdef n="pastperf"/>		<!-- past perfect -->
			<sdef n="ft"/>			<!-- future -->
			<sdef n="low"/>			<!-- lowest courtesy -->
			<sdef n="mid"/>			<!-- medium courtesy -->
			<sdef n="hi"/>			<!-- highest courtesy -->
			<sdef n="prn"/>			<!-- pronoun -->
			<sdef n="p1"/>			<!-- first person -->
			<sdef n="p2"/>			<!-- second person -->
			<sdef n="p3"/>			<!-- third person -->
    			<sdef n="adj"/> 		<!-- adjectives --> 
			<sdef n="ot"/>			<!-- others -->
			<sdef n="num"/> 		<!-- numerals -->
			<sdef n="sep"/> 		<!-- punctuation -->
			<sdef n="sent"/> 			<!-- sentence ending punctuation -->
  	</sdefs>
  	<pardefs>

		<pardef n="num">
      		<e>
        		<p>
	         		<l/>
          			<r><s n="num"/></r>
        		</p>
      		</e>
    	</pardef>

	<pardef n="sep">
      			<e>
      			<p>
	          		<l/>
          				<r><s n="sep"/></r>
        			</p>
	      		</e>
    		</pardef>

		<pardef n="sent">
      			<e>
      			<p>
	          		<l/>
          				<r><s n="sent"/></r>
        			</p>
	      		</e>
    		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="টা_enc">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="enc"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
			<pardef n="names_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>েক</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>র</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="months_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ের</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>পর্যন্ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="places_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>লৈ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ের</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>টা</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="subj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>টা</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="অভিমান_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="অপরাধ_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলির</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>টি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="চোখ_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>টি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>দিয়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="গামছা_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>তে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>টা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="চিল_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ইতিহাস_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ের</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="where"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>কে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>েও</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="অধ্যাপক_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>দের</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>জন</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>সকল</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>রা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>কে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>র</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>দেৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="অপশরা_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>রা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>র</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="হাসপাতাল_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>

			<e><p><l>টা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>পর্যন্ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>র</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="কৃষক_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>রা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>কে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="কলম_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>গুলি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>র</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ই</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="যদি_ot">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="ot"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="তুমি_prn">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="১"><i>১</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="২"><i>২</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="৪"><i>৪</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="৬"><i>৬</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="৮"><i>৮</i><par n="num"/></e>
		<e lm="."><i>.</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="\"><i>\</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm=";"><i>;</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm=":"><i>:</i><par n="sep"/></e>
		<e lm="!"><i>!</i><par n="sent"/></e>
		<e lm="৷"><i>৷</i><par n="sent"/></e>
		<e lm="?"><i>?</i><par n="sent"/></e>
		<e lm="টা"><i>টা</i><par n="টা_enc"/></e>
		<e lm="জন"><i>জন</i><par n="টা_enc"/></e>
		<e lm="অমৃত"><i>অমৃত</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="শ্রীকৃষ্ণ"><i>শ্রীকৃষ্ণ</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="রাম"><i>রাম</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="চাবাই প্রতাপ সিংহ"><i>চাবাই<b/>প্রতাপ<b/>সিংহ</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="চিচোরিয়া"><i>চিচোরিয়া</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
		<e lm="অগ্রহায়ণ"><i>অগ্রহায়ণ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="জুন"><i>জুন</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ফেব্রুয়ারি"><i>ফেব্রুয়ারি</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মে'"><i>মে'</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ডিসেম্বর"><i>ডিসেম্বর</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কাশ্মীর"><i>কাশ্মীর</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ৰাজস্থান"><i>রাজস্থান</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ওয়েলস"><i>ওয়েলস</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আইরণ ফোর্ট"><i>আইরণ<b/>ফোর্ট</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="অ্যাম্বার প্রাসাদ"><i>অ্যাম্বার<b/>প্রাসাদ</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
		<e lm="চোখ"><i>চোখ</i><par n="চোখ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আলু"><i>আলু</i><par n="অপরাধ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="অপশরা"><i>অপশরা</i><par n="অপশরা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="একাগ্রতা"><i>একাগ্রতা</i><par n="অভিমান_n"/></e>
		<e lm="সুযোগ"><i>সুযোগ</i><par n="অপরাধ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="হাসপাতাল"><i>হাসপাতাল</i><par n="গামছা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আদালত"><i>আদালত</i><par n="গামছা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="অপরাধী"><i>অপরাধী</i><par n="অধ্যাপক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আইনা"><i>আইনা</i><par n="গামছা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আয়না"><i>আয়না</i><par n="গামছা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ন্যায়"><i>ন্যায়</i><par n="অভিমান_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ভবন"><i>ভবন</i><par n="অপরাধ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="অপশরা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="অপশরা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="পায়রা"><i>পায়রা</i><par n="চিল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কৃষক"><i>কৃষক</i><par n="কৃষক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কাঁচি"><i>কাঁচি</i><par n="কলম_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কক্ষ"><i>কক্ষ</i><par n="ইতিহাস_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কোকিল"><i>কোকিল</i><par n="চিল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="গল্প"><i>গল্প</i><par n="অভিমান_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কাকা"><i>কাকা</i><par n="অধ্যাপক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="কাকী"><i>কাকী</i><par n="অপশরা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="পক্ষী"><i>পক্ষী</i><par n="চিল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="বস্তু"><i>বস্তু</i><par n="চোখ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="স্থান"><i>স্থান</i><par n="হাসপাতাল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="জন্তু"><i>জন্তু</i><par n="ইতিহাস_n"/></e>
		<e lm="হ্রদ"><i>হ্রদ</i><par n="অপরাধ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="টুকরা"><i>টুকরা</i><par n="অভিমান_n"/></e>
		<e lm="দোকান"><i>দোকান</i><par n="হাসপাতাল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="নববধূ"><i>নববধূ</i><par n="চিল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="শহর"><i>শহর</i><par n="হাসপাতাল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="পরীক্ষা"><i>পরীক্ষা</i><par n="ইতিহাস_n"/></e>
		<e lm="বোন"><i>বোন</i><par n="অভিমান_n"/></e>
		<e lm="বুড়া"><i>বুড়া</i><par n="অধ্যাপক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মামা"><i>মামা</i><par n="অধ্যাপক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মাসী"><i>মাসী</i><par n="অপশরা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="যুদ্ধ"><i>যুদ্ধ</i><par n="ইতিহাস_n"/></e>
		<e lm="মেয়ে"><i>মেয়ে</i><par n="চিল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="বিদ্যালয়"><i>বিদ্যালয়</i><par n="হাসপাতাল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="শতাব্দী"><i>শতাব্দী</i><par n="কলম_n"/></e>
		<e lm="যাদুঘর"><i>যাদুঘর</i><par n="হাসপাতাল_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আশ্রয়স্থল"><i>আশ্রয়স্থল</i><par n="গামছা_n"/></e>
		<e lm="গরিমা"><i>গরিমা</i><par n="কলম_n"/></e>
		<e lm="আইভরি"><i>আইভরি</i><par n="কলম_n"/></e>
		<e lm="বাজার"><i>বাজার</i><par n="অপরাধ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="জুতা"><i>জুতা</i><par n="কলম_n"/></e>
		<e lm="খাদ্যগ্রহণ"><i>খাদ্যগ্রহণ</i><par n="ইতিহাস_n"/></e>
		<e lm="ঘাস"><i>ঘাস</i><par n="চোখ_n"/></e>
		<e lm="সৌন্দর্য"><i>সৌন্দর্য</i><par n="অধ্যাপক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="দর্শক"><i>দর্শক</i><par n="কৃষক_n"/></e>
		<e lm="স্বাস্থ্য"><i>স্বাস্থ্য</i><par n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="কিছু"><i>কিছু</i><par n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="ঠিক"><i>ঠিক</i><par n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="খারাপ"><i>খারাপ</i><par n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="শক্তিশালী"><i>শক্তিশালী</i><par n="অতিপ্রাকৃত_adj"/></e>
		<e lm="কিভাবে"><i>কিভাবে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="দিকে"><i>দিকে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="শ্রী"><i>শ্রী</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="তার"><i>তার</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
		<e lm="তুই"><i>তুই</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="আমার"><i>আমার</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="এইগুলি"><i>এইগুলি</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
		<e lm="আমি"><i>আমি</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
